Utah statutes.
72-1-301.   Transportation Commission created -- Members, appointment, terms
-- Qualifications -- Pay and expenses -- Chair -- Quorum -- Surety bond.
(1) (a)  There is created the Transportation Commission which shall consist of
seven members.
(b)  The members of the commission shall be residents of Utah.
(c)  The members of the commission shall be selected on a nonpartisan basis.
(d) (i)  The commissioners shall be appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the Senate, for a term of six years, beginning on April 1 of odd-
numbered years, except as provided under Subsection (1)(d)(ii).
(ii)  The first two additional commissioners serving on the seven member
commission shall be appointed for terms of two years nine months and four
years nine months, respectively, initially commencing on July 1, 1996, and
subsequently commencing as specified under Subsection (1)(d)(i).
(e)  The commissioners serve on a part-time basis.
(f)  Each commissioner shall remain in office until a successor is appointed
and qualified.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the selection of the
commissioners shall be as follows:
(i) one commissioner from Box Elder, Cache, or Rich county;
(ii)  one commissioner from Salt Lake or Tooele county;
(iii)  one commissioner from Carbon, Emery, Grand, or San Juan county;
(iv)  one commissioner from Beaver, Garfield, Iron, Kane, Millard, Piute,
Sanpete, Sevier, Washington, or Wayne county;
(v)  one commissioner from Weber, Davis, or Morgan county;
(vi)  one commissioner from Juab, Utah, Wasatch, Duchesne, Summit, Uintah, or
Daggett county; and
(vii)  one commissioner selected from the state at large.
(b)  Beginning with the appointment of commissioners on or after July 1, 2009
and subject to the restriction in Subsection (2)(d), the selection of
commissioners shall be as follows:
(i)  four commissioners with one commissioner selected from each of the four
regions established by the department; and
(ii)  subject to the restriction in Subsection (2)(c), three commissioners
selected from the state at large.
(c) (i)  At least one of the three commissioners appointed under Subsection
(2)(b)(ii) shall be selected from a rural county.
(ii)  For purposes of this Subsection (2)(c), a rural county includes a county
of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class.
(d)  No more than two commissioners appointed under Subsection (2)(b) may be
selected from any one of the four regions established by the department.
(3) (a)  Members appointed before May 2, 1996, shall continue to receive the
compensation, per diem, expenses, and benefits they were receiving as of
January 1, 1996.
(b)  Members appointed after May 2, 1996, shall receive no compensation or
benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in
the performance of the member’s official duties at the rates established by
the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(c)  Members may decline to receive compensation, benefits, per diem, and
expenses for their service.
(4) (a)  One member of the commission shall be designated by the governor as
chair.
(b)  The commission shall select one member as vice chair to act in the
chair's absence.
(5)  Any four commissioners constitute a quorum.
(6) (a)  Each member of the commission shall qualify by:
(i)  taking the constitutional oath of office; and
(ii)  giving a surety bond.
(b)  The Division of Finance of the Department of Administrative Services
shall determine the form and amount of the bond, and the state shall pay the
bond premium.
